Washington statutes.
RCW 18.86.070

Duration of agency relationship.

(1) The agency relationships established pursuant to this chapter continue until the earliest of the following:

(a) Completion of performance by the broker;

(b) Expiration of the term agreed upon by the parties;

(c) Termination of the relationship by mutual agreement of the parties; or

(d) Termination of the relationship by notice from either party to the other. However, such a termination does not otherwise affect the contractual rights of either party.

(2) Except as otherwise agreed to in writing, a broker owes no further duty after termination of the agency relationship, other than the duty:

(a) To account for all moneys and property received during the relationship; and

(b) To not disclose confidential information.

[ 2023 c 318 s 7; 2013 c 58 s 8; 1997 c 217 s 5; 1996 c 179 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 318: See note following RCW 18.86.010.

Real estate agency pamphlet—1997 c 217 ss 1-6: See note following RCW 18.86.120.

Effective date—1997 c 217 ss 1-6 and 8: See note following RCW 18.86.020.